Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2286.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriations; department of transportation; Navajo Nation; senior center and veterans building; State Route 264; Ganado water pipeline; exemption A. The following sums are appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to the Navajo division of transportation for the following projects: 1. $600,000 to complete pavement at Ganado senior citizens center and veterans building. 2. $1,700,000 for the State Route 264 milepost 441 turning lane. 3. $340,000 for materials and construction costs for the Ganado waterline project. B. The appropriations made in subsection A of this section are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.